Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-442
Fixing boundaries; procedure; petition; hearing.

Upon filing the petition mentioned in section 31-402, the county clerk shall designate and endorse thereon a day for the hearing and determination of said petition by the county board which shall not be less than fourteen days subsequent to the filing of the petition, and the county board may pass on the petition and fix the boundaries at any time on or after the date fixed by the county clerk.

Laws 1909, c. 150, § 1, p. 533;

R.S.1913, § 1906;

C.S.1922, § 1854;

C.S.1929, § 31-542;

R.S.1943, § 31-442.